Idaho, session 2025, H0415.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
recognize the importance of maintaining local and regional control over
critical energy infrastructure. This section is intended to protect Idaho's
energy independence by preventing organizations created or controlled by
other state governments from owning, operating, or controlling Idaho elec-
trical transmission facilities.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-338, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-338. RESTRICTIONS ON OWNERSHIP OF ENERGY INFRASTRUCTURE IN
IDAHO. (1) No entity that was established, chartered, or primarily governed
by another state of the United States, or an agency thereof, shall acquire,
hold, or operate any ownership interest in Idaho's electrical transmission
facilities. This prohibition applies to transmission lines, substations,
and other related infrastructure that is directly involved in the interstate
or intrastate transmission of electricity.
(2) This section shall not:
(a) Apply to private entities, investor-owned utilities, cooperative
utilities, or independent transmission developers that are not di-
rectly created or controlled by another state government; or
(b) Prohibit Idaho-based utilities or businesses from entering
into contractual agreements for energy transmission services with
out-of-state entities.
(3) The Idaho public utilities commission shall have the authority to
review and authenticate the ownership of electrical transmission infra-
structure in Idaho to ensure compliance with this section.
(4) Any entity in violation of this section shall be required to divest
its interest in Idaho energy infrastructure within a period to be determined
by the commission but by no later than two (2) years from the effective date
of this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.